Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 651. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 651.001. DEFINITION. In any state statute, "officer" means an officer of this state unless otherwise expressly provided.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 651.002. BENEFITS OF AND RESTRICTIONS ON STATE EMPLOYEES WORKING OUT OF STATE. A state employee who is required to work outside of this state is entitled to the same benefits and is subject to the same restrictions provided by law for other state employees, including vacation, leave from employment, and the employment policies and restrictions provided by the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 651.003. WRITTEN STATEMENT OF DISSENTING BOARD MEMBER. A member of the governing board of an agency in the executive branch of state government may dissent from an action taken by the board and is entitled to enter a written statement of dissent into the minutes of the meeting.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 651.004. MANAGEMENT-TO-STAFF RATIOS. (a) A state agency shall develop procedures for use in achieving a management-to-staff ratio of one manager for each 11 staff members.

(b) In this section, "state agency" has the meaning assigned by Section 2052.101.

(c) A state agency in the executive branch of state government that employs more than 100 full-time equivalent employees may not employ more than one full-time equivalent employee in a management position for every 11 full-time equivalent employees that the agency employs in nonmanagerial staff positions.

(c-1) Expired.

(c-2) Expired.

(c-3) Expired.

(d) A state agency that believes that the minimum management-to-staff ratios required by this section are inappropriate for that agency may appeal to the Legislative Budget Board. The Legislative Budget Board by rule shall adopt appeal procedures.

(e) The Department of Family and Protective Services is not required to comply with management-to-staff ratio requirements of this section with respect to caseworker supervisors, program directors, and program administrators.

(f) The Parks and Wildlife Department is not required to comply with management-to-staff ratio requirements of this section with respect to employees located in field-based operations.

(g) The Texas Historical Commission is not required to comply with management-to-staff ratio requirements of this section with respect to employees located in field-based operations.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1035, Sec. 88, eff. June 19, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 16(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 16(c), eff. Sept. 1, 2005; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 16(d), eff. Sept. 1, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 268 (S.B. 6), Sec. 1.71, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 14, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1245 (S.B. 1518), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 651.005. REQUIREMENT OF SELECTIVE SERVICE REGISTRATION OR EXEMPTION. (a) An agency in any branch of state government may not hire a person as an employee if the person is of the age and gender that would require a person residing in the United States to register with the selective service system under federal law, unless the person presents proof of the person's:

(1) registration with the selective service system as required by federal law; or

(2) exemption from registration with the selective service system.

(b) This section does not apply to a person employed by a state agency before September 1, 1999, as long as the person's employment by the agency is continuous.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 171, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 651.006. REDUCTIONS IN FORCE. A state governmental entity undergoing a reorganization mandated by statute may institute a reduction in force as a direct result of the reorganization, notwithstanding a rule, personnel handbook, or policy of the entity to the contrary.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 651.005 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(56), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 651.007. EXIT INTERVIEWS. (a) In this section, "state agency" means a board, commission, council, committee, department, office, agency, or other governmental entity in the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government. The term does not include an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(b) Each state agency shall conduct an exit interview with an employee who leaves employment with the agency. The state agency shall conduct the exit interview by having the employee access the questionnaire posted on the state auditor's Internet site and electronically submit the completed questionnaire to the state auditor. The questionnaire must state that the employee has the option of having the employee's questionnaire furnished to the head of the agency or the governor's office.

(c) The state agency shall conduct the exit interview in a manner that allows the employee alone to describe the employee's reason for leaving employment. The state agency may not alter the description stated by the employee. The state agency may not have access to the questionnaire unless it is provided by the employee under Subsection (b).

(d) Subject to Subsection (j), the state auditor shall develop the exit interview questionnaire. In developing the questionnaire under this subsection, the state auditor shall consult with the comptroller and representatives designated by the comptroller from small, medium, and large state agencies.

(e) Not later than the 15th day following the end of the calendar quarter, the state auditor shall submit, subject to Subsection (j), a report to each state agency containing the responses to the exit interview questionnaire submitted by each former employee of the agency during the preceding quarter. The state auditor's report may not contain the name of an employee or any other information identifying the employee.

(f) A state agency may not share the responses to an exit interview questionnaire with another state agency.

(g) The responses to an exit interview questionnaire are confidential and not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, including responses to a questionnaire furnished to an entity listed under Subsection (b). The responses may be disclosed only to a law enforcement agency in a criminal investigation or on order of a court.

(h) Subject to Subsection (j), the state auditor may audit each state agency's records to determine whether the agency is complying with the requirements of this section.

(i) Not later than December 15 of each year before a regular session of the legislature, the state auditor shall submit a report summarizing the findings of the exit interviews to the governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and members of the Senate Committee on Finance and House Committee on Appropriations.

(j) Work performed under this section by the state auditor is subject to approval by the legislative audit committee for inclusion in the audit plan under Section 321.013(c).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 733, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 651.008. UNCONSTITUTIONALLY COMPOSED GOVERNING BODY WITH SIX-YEAR TERMS. (a) This section applies to the governing body of a state board or commission or other state agency only if:

(1) by statute the governing body is composed of an even number of voting members, the appointed members of whom serve staggered six-year terms; and

(2) there is no provision of the Texas Constitution under which the governing body is allowed to be composed in that manner and serve staggered six-year terms.

(b) Notwithstanding the terms of the statute that prescribes the composition and terms of the governing body, the appointed members of the governing body serve two-year terms.

(c) The terms of the members of the governing body who have served less than two years since the date their current terms began expire on the second anniversary of the date their current terms began. The members of the governing body who have served two or more years since the date their current terms began are considered to be performing the duties of their office in a holdover capacity until their successors are qualified in accordance with Section 17, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(d) As soon as possible after it is determined that this section applies to the governing body, the administrative head of the state board or commission or other state agency shall inform of that fact:

(1) each state officer or other entity that by statute appoints one or more members to the governing body;

(2) the governor and the presiding officer of each house of the legislature;

(3) each standing committee of each house of the legislature that under the rules of either house has jurisdiction over legislative matters pertaining to the board, commission, or other agency; and

(4) the Legislative Reference Library for purposes of including current information in the Texas Appointment System database.

(e) As soon as possible after an appointing officer or entity is informed under Subsection (d), the appointing authority shall make any necessary appointments or reappointments to the governing body to fill the positions of members described by Subsection (c) who are serving in a holdover capacity. If a member whose position is being filled has served two or more years but less than four years of a term, the appointment made under this subsection is for a term expiring on the fourth anniversary of the date the term began. If a member whose position is being filled has served four or more years but less than six years of a term, the appointment made under this subsection is for a term expiring on the sixth anniversary of the date the term began.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 50.01, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 651.0085. CERTAIN UNCONSTITUTIONALLY COMPOSED DISTRICTS AND AUTHORITIES WITH SIX-YEAR TERMS. (a) This section applies only to the governing body of a district or authority created under Section 52(b), Article III, Texas Constitution, or Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and only if:

(1) by law the governing body is composed of an even number of voting members; and

(2) the elected or appointed members of the governing body serve staggered six-year terms and the only provision of the Texas Constitution under which the members of the governing body are allowed to serve staggered six-year terms is Section 30a, Article XVI.

(b) Section 651.008 does not apply to a district or authority to which this section applies.

(c) Notwithstanding the terms of the enabling statute of the district or authority that prescribes the number of members of the governing body:

(1) if some or all of the members of the governing body are appointed, the governor shall appoint an additional public or at-large member, as applicable, to the governing body for an initial term expiring on the date on which the terms of members of the governing body whose terms are scheduled to expire between four and six years after the date of the governor's appointment under this subdivision expire; and

(2) if all of the members of the governing body are elected, an additional public or at-large elected position, as applicable, is created on the governing body and the governor shall appoint the initial member to fill that position for an initial term expiring on the first date on which members' terms expire following the next election for members of the governing body.

(d) As soon as possible after it is determined that this section applies to the governing body, the administrative head of the district or authority shall inform of that fact:

(1) each appointing authority that by statute appoints one or more members to the governing body;

(2) the governor and the presiding officer of each house of the legislature;

(3) each standing committee of each house of the legislature that under the rules of either house has jurisdiction over legislative matters pertaining to the district or authority;

(4) the secretary of state, if the governing body is subject to Subsection (c)(2), for purposes of allowing the secretary of state to advise the district or authority on matters relating to preclearance under the federal Voting Rights Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1973c et seq.); and

(5) the Legislative Reference Library for purposes of including current information in the Texas Appointment System database.

(e) If the governor appoints a member to the governing body of the district or authority under Subsection (c)(1) and the legislature does not, by law, make other arrangements for electing or appointing a person to fill the position, the governor shall continue to appoint a member to fill the position as vacancies in the position occur and as a member's term in the position expires. If the governor appoints a member to the governing body of the district or authority under Subsection (c)(2) and the legislature does not, by law, make other arrangements for electing or appointing a person to fill the position, the position shall be filled by election as vacancies in the position occur and as a member's term in the position expires, except to the extent that the enabling statute for the district or authority provides a different method for filling vacancies on the governing body.

(f) After the initial term of a position created under this section expires, the term of the position is six years.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 50.01, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 651.009. DIVERSITY ON GOVERNING BODY. (a) In each case in which the governing body of a state board, commission, or other state agency that has statewide jurisdiction is appointed by the governor or another appointing authority, the governor or appointing authority shall ensure that, to the extent possible, the membership of the governing body reflects the racial, ethnic, and geographic diversity of this state.

(b) In the case of a governing body the membership of which is appointed by two or more appointing authorities, the appointing authorities shall coordinate their appointments, to the extent possible, as necessary to comply with Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 50.01, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 651.010. ENTREPRENEUR-IN-RESIDENCE. (a) In this section, "state agency" means a board, commission, department, office, or other agency in the executive branch of state government created under the constitution or a statute of this state, including an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(b) From available funds, a state agency may hire an entrepreneur-in-residence or contract with an individual, chamber of commerce, or nonprofit entity to:

(1) improve outreach by state government to the private sector, including historically underutilized businesses;

(2) strengthen coordination and interaction between state government and the private sector;

(3) facilitate the understanding and use of technological advances to make state government more transparent and interactive; and

(4) implement the best private sector practices to make state government programs simpler, easier to access, more efficient, and more responsive to users.

(c) An individual hired or contracted with under this section must be successful in the individual's field.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (S.B. 328), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.